District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Improving Tenant Access to Water Bills Amendment Act of 2025”.

Sec. 2. Section 101 of the District of Columbia Public Works Act of 1954, approved May
18, 1954 (68 Stat. 102; D.C. Official Code § 34–2303), is amended to read as follows:
“(a) If an owner of a residential property, their agent, or a third party service is billed
directly by the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“DC Water”) for water and
sanitary sewer services provided to the residential property, an authorized tenant who resides at
the service address may request and receive a copy of the water and sanitary sewer services if the
person is an authorized tenant.
“(b) Any payment made by a tenant of residential property pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section shall be deemed in lieu of an equal amount of rent and shall be deducted, by the
landlord, from any rent due and owing or to become due and owing to the owner, agent, lessor,
or manager of the residential property.

“(c) An authorized tenant that is eligible for a payment plan or any customer assistance
programs may apply for both the plan or any applicable programs and may receive assistance
from the People’s Counsel.
“(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent the Mayor from pursuing any other appropriate
action or remedy at law or equity against an owner, agent, lessor, manager, or tenant of a
residential property, including that DC Water shall retain the right to lien the account property in
accordance with provision for DC Code §34-2407.02 et seq.
“(e) DC Water shall not be responsible for the fraudulent acts or acts of omission
associated with deeming a person an authorized tenant, and the DC Water shall incur no liability
associated deeming the tenant an authorized tenant.
“(f) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Authorized tenant” is a person who has provided acceptable evidence of
occupancy in accordance with rules issued pursuant to § 34-2306.
“(2) “Residential property” means a property that contains an ambulatory care
facility, group home, sleeping unit, dwelling unit, housing unit, custodial care facility, or foster
care facility as those terms are defined in Section 202 of the Building Code Supplement of 2017
(12A D.C.M.R § 202 (2021)).”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the


Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.